Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1441
Law enforcement reserve officer; monetary assistance; hospital and medical benefits.

(1) Each law enforcement reserve officer shall be paid at a minimum rate of one dollar per year. The governing body of a county or city may provide additional monetary assistance for the purchase and maintenance of uniforms and equipment used by such officers.

(2) Hospital and medical assistance shall be provided by the governing body to members of the law enforcement reserve force who sustain injury in the course of performing official duties. Such benefits shall be provided in the same manner as those benefits provided for a full-time deputy sheriff or police officer.

Laws 1976, LB 782, § 4.